Utah statutes.
41-6a-606.   Speed contest or exhibition on highway -- Barricade or obstruction.

(1)  A person may not engage in any motor vehicle speed contest or exhibition of speed on a highway.

(2)  A person may not, in any manner, obstruct or place any barricade or obstruction or assist or participate in placing any barricade or obstruction upon any highway for any purpose prohibited under Subsection (1).

(3)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(4) (a)  In addition to the penalty provided under this section or any other section, a person who violates Subsection (1) shall have the person's driver license suspended under Subsection 53-3-220(1)(a)(xvi) for a period of:

(i)  60 days for a first offense; and

(ii)  90 days for a second offense within three years of a prior offense.

(b)  The court shall forward the report of the conviction to the Driver License Division in accordance with Section 53-3-218.

